Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.215

Engaging in other business activities.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, in addition to all powers enumerated by this title, and those necessarily implied therefrom, a bank may engage in other business activities that have been determined by the board of governors of the federal reserve system or by the United States Congress to be closely related to the business of banking, as of July 28, 2013.

(2) A bank that desires to perform an activity that is not expressly authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall first apply to the director for authorization to conduct such activity. Within thirty days of the receipt of this application, the director shall determine whether the activity is closely related to the business of banking, whether the public convenience and advantage will be promoted, whether the activity is apt to create an unsafe and unsound practice by the bank and whether the applicant is capable of performing such an activity. If the director finds the activity to be closely related to the business of banking and the bank is otherwise qualified, he or she shall immediately inform the applicant that the activity is authorized. If the director determines that such activity is not closely related to the business of banking or that the bank is not otherwise qualified, he or she shall promptly inform the applicant in writing. The applicant shall have the right to appeal from an unfavorable determination in accordance with the procedures of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. In determining whether a particular activity is closely related to the business of banking, the director shall be guided by the rulings of the board of governors of the federal reserve system and the comptroller of the currency in making determinations in connection with the powers exercisable by bank holding companies, and the activities performed by other commercial banks or their holding companies.

(3) Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements of law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a bank has under the laws of this state, a bank shall have the powers and authorities conferred as of July 28, 1985, or as of any subsequent date not later than July 28, 2013, upon any federally chartered bank doing business in this state. A bank may exercise the powers and authorities conferred on a federally chartered bank after July 28, 2013, only if the director finds that the exercise of such powers and authorities:

(a) Serves the convenience and advantage of depositors, borrowers, or the general public; and

(b) Maintains the fairness of competition and parity between state-chartered banks and federally chartered banks.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a bank has the powers and authorities that an out-of-state state bank operating a branch in Washington has if the director finds that the exercise of such powers and authorities serves the convenience and advantage of depositors and borrowers, or the general public, and maintains the fairness of competition and parity between state-chartered banks and out-of-state state banks.

(5) As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include without limitation powers and authorities in corporate governance and operational matters.

(6) The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to specific powers and authorities of federally chartered banks and out-of-state state banks, as applicable, shall apply to banks exercising those powers and authorities permitted under this section but only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate to exercising the powers and authorities granted banks solely under this section.

(7) The director may require a bank to provide notice to the director prior to implementation of a plan to develop, improve, or continue holding real estate, including capitalized and operating leases, acquired through any means in full or partial satisfaction of a debt previously contracted, under circumstances which a national bank would be required to provide notice to the comptroller of the currency prior to implementation of such a plan. The director may adopt rules or issue orders, directives, standards, policies, memoranda, or other official communications to specify guidance with regard to the exercise of the powers and authorities to expend such funds as are needed to enable a bank to recover its total investment to the fullest extent authorized for a national bank under the national bank act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 29.

(8) Any activity which may be performed by a bank, except the taking of deposits, may be performed by (a) a corporation or (b) another entity approved by the director, which in either case is owned in whole or in part by the bank.

[ 2014 c 37 s 121; 2013 c 76 s 4; 2010 c 88 s 12; 2003 c 24 s 2. Prior: 1995 c 344 s 2; 1995 c 134 s 2; prior: 1994 c 256 s 37; 1994 c 92 s 20; 1986 c 279 s 10; 1983 c 157 s 8; 1969 c 136 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.04.215.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—1983 c 157: See note following RCW 30A.04.060.